en: chili paste
sv: chilipasta

en: chili in vinegar
de: Chilli in Essig
es: guindillas en vinagre
fr: piments au vinaigre
hr: čili u octu
it: peperoncini sott'aceto
nl: chilipepers in azijn

en: preserved chili pepper
de: konservierter Chilipfeffer
fi: säilötty chili
hr: konzervirana čili papričica
it: peperoncino conservato

en: red chili pepper, red chili, red chilli pepper, red chilli, red chillies, red chile, red chile pepper, red chilies
bg: червени люти чушки, чили чушки
da: rød chili
de: roter Chili, rote Chili-Schoten
es: chile rojo, chiles rojos, red-chili, chili rojo
fi: punainen chili
fr: piment rouge, piments rouges
hr: crvene papričice, crveni čili, ljuta paprika
it: peperoncini rossi
nb: rød chili pepper, rød chili
nl: rode peper, rode chilipeper, rode chili, rode chili peper, spaanse peper
pl: czerwona papryka chili, czerwona papryczka chili, czerwone papryczki chili, papryczka czerwona chilli
sv: röd chili, röd chilipeppar

en: red chili paste
sv: röd chilipasta

en: red chili purée, red chilli purée
de: rotes Chili-Püree, rotes Chilipüree
fr: Purée de piment rouge
hr: pire od crvenog čilija
it: purè di peperoncino rosso

en: pounded red chili pepper
hr: crvena tucana ljuta paprika
it: peperoncino rosso pestato

en: red pepper seed oil
de: roter Pfeffer Kernöl, Rotes Chiliesamenöl
fr: huile de graines de piment rouge
hr: ulje sjemenki crvene paprike
it: olio di semi di peperoncino rosso
nl: rode peper zaad olie
pl: olej z nasion czerwonej papryki

en: green chili pepper, green chili, green chilli pepper, green chilli, green chillies, green chile, green chile pepper, green chilies
bg: зелени люти чушки
da: grøn chili
de: grüne Chili
es: guindilla verde
fi: vihreä chili
fr: piments verts, piment vert
hr: zelena čili papričica
it: peperoncino verde
nl: Groene chilipepers
pl: zielona papryka chili, zielona papryczka chili
sv: grön chili

en: green chili paste
sv: grön chilipasta

en: hot chili peppers, hot pepper
bg: люти чушки
de: scharfe chilischoten, scharfe Pfefferoni, Paprika scharf
es: guindilla fuerte
fi: tuliset chilit, tulinen chili
fr: piment fort, piments forts
hr: ljuta začinska paprika, peperoncini, mini ljute papričice cijele, feferoni ljuti, ljuti feferoni
hu: csípős paprika
it: peperoncino piccante
nl: scherpe peperoni, scherpsmakende pepers

en: Espelette chili pepper
de: Gorria
es: Pimiento de Espelette
eu: Ezpeletako biperra
fi: espelette-paprika
fr: piment d'espelette
hr: espelette čili papričica
it: peperoncino di Espelette
ja: エスプレット
ko: 에스플레트고추
nl: Espelettepeper
pl: Pieprz z Espelette
ru: Эспелетский перец
sv: espelette paprika
tl: Espelette pepper

en: jalapeno pepper, jalapeño pepper, jalapeño chilli, jalapeño chillies
xx: jalapeño, jalapeños, jalapeño chili, jalapeno, jalapenos, jalapeno chili
ar: هالبينو
bg: халапеньо, чушки халапеньо
ca: bitxo jalapeño
da: jalapeño chili
de: Jalapeno-Chilis, Jalapenopfeffer
eo: ĥalapenjokapsiko
es: Pimientos Jalapeños, pimiento jalapeño rojo
fa: هالاپینو
fi: jalapeño, jalapenot, jalapeñoa
fr: piments jalapeño, piment jalapeño
gl: pemento xalapeño
he: חלפניו
hr: jalapeno papričica
hu: jalapeno paprika
hy: հալապենո
it: Peperoncini jalapeños
ja: ハラペーニョ
kn: ಹಾಲಪೇನ್ಯೊ
ko: 할라페뇨
ml: ഹലപീനൊ
nl: Jalapeno pepers, jalapeño peper
pl: papryczki jalapeño, papryka jalapeño, papryka jalapeno, papryczka chili jalapeño, papryczka chili jalapeno, papryczki chili jalapeño, papryczki jalapeno, papryczka jalapeño
pt: pimenta-jalapenho
ru: халапеньо
sv: jalapeñopeppar, jalapenopeppar, jalapeño peppar, jalapeno peppar, jalapeñochili
th: ฆาลาเปญโญ
uk: халапеньйо
zh: 墨西哥辣椒

en: green jalapeno peppers, green jalapeno
da: grøn jalapeño, grønne jalapeños
de: grüne jalapenos
fi: vihreä jalapeño, vihreä jalapeno, vihreät jalapenot
fr: piment jalapeño vert
hr: zelene jalapeno paprike
it: peperoni jalapeno verdi
pl: zielona papryka jalapeño, zielona papryka jalapeno, papryka zielona jalapeño
sv: grön jalapeño

en: chipotle, chipotle chilli, chipotle chile, chipotle pepper
xx: chipotle, chipotle chili
bg: Chipotle чили пипер
de: Chipotle, Chipotle Chili, Chipotle Chilischoten
el: τσιπότλε
es: chile chipotle
fr: chipotle, piment chipotle
he: צ'יפוטלה
it: chipotle, pepe chipotle
ja: チポトレ
kn: ಚಿಪೋಟ್ಲೆ
ko: 치폴레
pl: papryka chipotle
ru: чипотле
th: ชิโปตเล
uk: чипотле

en: hot jalapeno pepper, hot jalapeno
da: stærk jalapeño
sv: stark jalapeño, stark jalapeno

en: bird's eye chili, thai chili
bn: থাই মরিচ
da: thai chili
de: Bird's eye chili
es: chile ojo de pájaro
fi: rawit, thai-chili, thai chili
fr: piment œil d'oiseau
hr: chili iz ptičje perspektive
hu: thai paprika
id: cabai rawit
it: thai pepper
jv: lombok rawit
ko: 새눈고추
ms: cili padi
nl: rawit
ru: птичий глаз
su: céngék
sv: thai chili
th: พริกขี้หนู
tl: siling thai
vi: ớt hiểm

en: allspice, all spice, Jamaica pepper, myrtle pepper
af: wonderpeper
ar: فلفل إفرنجي
az: ikievli pimenta
be: ангельскае зелле, пімента лекавая
bg: бахар
bn: কাবাব চিনি
ca: pebrer de Jamaica, pebre de Jamaica
cs: nové koření, pimentovník pravý
da: allehånde
de: Jamaikapfeffer, Piment, Allgewürz, Viergewürz
el: μπαχάρι
eo: dioika pimento
es: pimienta de Jamaica
et: vürtspipar, harilik pimendipuu
fa: فلفل فرنگی
fi: maustepippuri
fr: piment de la Jamaïque, piment de Jamaïque
ga: ilspíosra
hr: pimen
ht: malagèt
hu: szegfűbors
hy: բուրավետ պղպեղ
id: merica Jamaika
is: allrahanda
it: pepe di Giamaica, pepe garofanato, pimenteira
ja: オールスパイス
ko: 올스파이스나무
la: Pimenta dioica
lt: kvapusis pipiras
ml: സർവ സുഗന്ധി
ms: rempah tiga rasa
nb: allehånde
nl: Jamaicaanse peper
nn: allehande
pl: ziele angielskie, ziela angielskiego, pieprz z Jamajki, korzennik lekarski
pt: pimenta da Jamaica
ro: ienibahar
ru: перец душистый, перец душистый молотый, душистый перец, пимента лекарственная
sl: piment, pimentovec
sr: најгвирц
sv: kryddpeppar
ta: ஆல்ஸ்பைஸ்
th: ออลสไปซ์
to: sipaisi
tr: yeni bahar
uk: перець духмяний, духмяний перець
ur: سیتل چینی
zh: 多香果

en: habanero chili, habanero chili pepper, habanero chile, habanero chile pepper, habanero chilli, habanero chilli pepper, habanero chillies, habanero pepper, habanero
da: habanero chili
de: Habanero Chili
fi: habanero, habanero chili
fr: Piment Habanero
hr: habanero čili
it: Peperoncino Habanero
sv: habanero chili

en: pimiento, pimientos, pimento, pimentos
ar: فلفل إسباني
de: Kirschpaprika
fi: pimento, pimento-chili
hr: piment
hu: pimiento paprika
id: cabai ceri
it: pimento
ja: ピメント
ko: 체리고추
nl: piment
pl: papryka wiśniowa, papryka czereśniowa, papryka czerwona czereśniowa
sv: pimento, pimento chili
uk: пім'єнто
vi: ớt pimiento